California statutes. Labor Code
Any person who willfully violates this section shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or to imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both. A person shall not be imprisoned under this section, except for an offense committed after the conviction of
 that person for a prior offense under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 159.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1309.5.

(a) Every person who, with knowledge that a person is a minor under 18 years of age, or who, while in possession of these facts that he or she should reasonably know that the person is a minor under 18 years of age, knowingly sells or distributes for resale films, photographs, slides, or magazines which depict a minor under 18 years of age engaged in sexual conduct as defined in Section 311.4 of the Penal Code, shall determine the names and addresses of persons from whom this material is obtained, and shall keep a record of these names and addresses. These records shall be kept for a period of three years after the material is obtained, and shall be kept confidential except that they shall be available to law enforcement officers as described in Section 830.1 and subdivision (h) of Section 830.3 of the Penal Code upon request.

(b) Every retailer who knows or reasonably should know that films, photographs, slides, or magazines depict a minor under the age of 18 years engaged in sexual conduct as defined in Section 311.4 of the Penal Code, shall keep a record of the names and addresses of persons from whom this material is acquired. These records shall be kept for a period of three years after the material is acquired, and shall be kept confidential except that they shall be available to law enforcement officers as described in Section 830.1 and subdivision (h) of Section 830.3 of the Penal Code upon request.

(c) The failure to keep and maintain the records described in subdivisions (a) and (b) for a period of three years after the obtaining or acquisition of this material is a misdemeanor. Disclosure of these records by law enforcement officers, except in the performance of their duties, is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 806, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1309.6.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of Section 1309.5 shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) If the action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the State Treasurer. If brought by a district attorney or county counsel, the entire amount of penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county and one-half to the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 887, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1310.

This chapter and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1390) do not prohibit or prevent any of the following:

(a) The appearance of any minor in any church, public or religious school, or community entertainment.

(b) The appearance of any minor in any school entertainment or in any entertainment for charity or for children, for which an admission fee is not charged.

(c) The appearance of any minor in any radio or television broadcasting or digital exhibition, if the minor does not receive compensation directly or indirectly therefor, the engagement of
 the minor is limited to a single appearance lasting not more than one hour, and an admission fee is not charged for the radio
 or television broadcasting or digital exhibition.

(d) The appearance of any minor at any one event during a calendar year, occurring on a day on which school attendance is not required or on the day preceding such a day, lasting four hours or less, if a parent or guardian of the minor is present, for which the minor does not directly or indirectly receive any compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 261, Sec. 1.   (AB 2388)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1311.

The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall enforce this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 161.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1311.5.

(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Child Labor Protection Act of 2014.

(b) The statute of limitations for claims arising under this code shall be tolled until an individual allegedly aggrieved by an unlawful practice attains the age of majority. This subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(c) In addition to other remedies available, an individual who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, retaliated against, subjected to an adverse action, or in any other manner discriminated against in the terms or conditions of his or her employment because the individual filed a claim or civil action alleging a violation of
 this code that arose while the individual was a minor, whether the claim or civil action was filed before or after the individual reached the age of majority, is entitled to treble damages.

(d) A class “A” violation, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1288, that involves a minor 12 years of age or younger shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 376.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1312.

This chapter does not limit the authority of the Attorney General or the district attorney of any county, either upon their own complaint or the complaint of any person acting for himself or the general public, to prosecute actions, either civil or criminal, for violations of this chapter, or to enforce the provisions thereof independently and without specific direction of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 162.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Working Hours [1390. - 1399.]

1390.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates:

(a) “Horticultural” includes the curing and drying but not the canning of all varieties of fruit.

(b) “Drama” or “play” includes the production of motion picture plays.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 164.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1391.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 1297, 1298, and 1308.7:

(1) An employer shall not employ a minor 15 years of age or younger for more than eight hours in one day of 24 hours, or more than 40 hours in one week, or before 7 a.m. or after 7 p.m., except that from June 1 through Labor Day, a minor 15 years of age or younger may be employed for the hours authorized by this section until 9 p.m. in the evening.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), while school is in session, an employer shall not employ a minor 14 or 15 years of age for more than three hours in any schoolday, nor more than 18 hours in any week, nor during school hours, except that a minor enrolled in
 and employed pursuant to a school-supervised and school-administered work experience and career exploration program may be employed for no more than 23 hours, any portion of which may be during school hours.

(3) An employer shall not employ a minor 16 or 17 years of age for more than eight hours in one day of 24 hours or more than 48 hours in one week, or before 5 a.m., or after 10 p.m. on any day preceding a schoolday. However, a minor 16 or 17 years of age may be employed for the hours authorized by this section during any evening preceding a nonschoolday until 12:30 a.m. of the nonschoolday.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), while school is in session, an employer shall not employ a minor 16 or 17 years of age for more than four hours in any schoolday, except as follows:

(A) The minor is employed in personal
 attendant occupations, as defined in the Industrial Welfare Commission Minimum Wage Order No. 15 (8 Cal. Code Regs. Sec. 11150), school-approved work experience, or cooperative vocational education programs.

(B) The minor has been issued a permit to work pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 49112 of the Education Code and is employed in accordance with the provisions of that permit.

(b) For purposes of this section, “schoolday” means any day in which a minor is required to attend school for 240 minutes or more.

(c) Any person or the agent or officer thereof, or any parent or guardian, who directly or indirectly violates or causes or suffers the violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or
 imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 60 days, or both. Any person who willfully violates this section shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or to imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both. No person shall be imprisoned under this section, except for an offense committed after the conviction of that person for a prior offense under this chapter.

(d) This section does not apply to any minor employed to deliver newspapers to consumers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 165.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1391.1.

Minors 16 years of age or older and under the age of 18 years enrolled in work experience or cooperative vocational education programs approved by the State Department of Education or in work experience education programs conducted by private schools may work after 10 p.m. but not later than 12:30 a.m., providing such employment is not detrimental to the health, education, or welfare of the minor and the approval of the parent and the work experience coordinator has been obtained. However, if any such minor works any time during the hours from 10 p.m. to 12:30 a.m., he or she shall be paid for work during that time at a rate which is not less than the minimum wage paid to adults.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 231, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1391.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 1391 and 1391.1, any minor under 18 years of age who has been graduated from a high school maintaining a four-year course above the eighth grade of the elementary schools, or who has had an equal amount of education in a private school or by private tuition, or who has been awarded a certificate of proficiency pursuant to Section 48412 of the Education Code, may be employed for the same hours as an adult may be employed in performing the same work.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of the orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, no employer shall pay any minor described in this section in his employ at wage rates less than the rates paid to adult employees in the same establishment for the same quantity and quality of the same classification of work; provided, however, that nothing herein shall prohibit a variation of rates of pay for such minors and adult employees engaged in the same classification of work based upon a difference in seniority, length of service, ability, skill, difference in duties or services performed, whether regularly or occasionally, difference in the shift or time of day worked, hours of work, or other reasonable differentiation, when exercised in good faith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 765.)
-------------------------------------------

1392.

Every person who has a minor under his or her control, as a ward or an apprentice, and who, except in household occupations, requires the minor to work more than eight hours in any one day, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1175, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1393.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and Article 2 (commencing with Section 49110) of Chapter 7 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, the Labor Commissioner may issue an exemption from laws regulating the employment of minors to employers operating agricultural packing plants that employ minors 16 and 17 years of age during any day during which school is not in session, for up to 10 hours per day during the peak harvest season. These exemptions shall only be granted if they do not materially affect the safety and welfare of minor employees and will prevent undue hardship on the employer. The Labor Commissioner may require an inspection of an agricultural packing plant prior to issuing an exemption.

(b) Any exemption granted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be in writing to be effective, and may be revoked after reasonable notice is given, in writing, by the Labor Commissioner. Any notice of revocation shall include the reason for the revocation.

(c) An application for an exemption under subdivision (a) shall be made by an employer on a form provided by the Labor Commissioner, and a copy of the application shall be posted at the employer’s place of employment at the time the application is filed with the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 166.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1394.

This chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1285) do not prohibit or prevent either of the following:

(a) The employment of any minor at agricultural, horticultural, viticultural, or domestic labor during the time the public schools are not in session, or during other than school hours, when the work performed is for or under the control of his parent or guardian and is performed upon or in connection with premises owned, operated or controlled by the parent or guardian. However, nothing herein shall permit children under schoolage to work at these occupations while the public schools are in session.

(b) The full-time employment of minors who meet all other legal employment
 requirements, if they are exempt from compulsory school attendance under Section 48231 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 168.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1398.

The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 169.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1399.

This chapter does not limit the authority of the Attorney General or the district attorney of any county, either upon their own complaint or the complaint of any person acting for himself or the general public, to prosecute actions, either civil or criminal, for violations of this chapter, or to enforce the provisions thereof independently and without specific direction of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 170.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Relocations, Terminations, and Mass Layoffs [1400. - 1413.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Cal/WARN Requirements [1400. - 1408.]

1400.

This chapter may be cited as the “California Worker Adjustment and Retraining Act” or “Cal/WARN Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 752, Sec. 1.   (AB 1601)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1400.5.

The definitions set forth in this section shall govern the construction and meaning of the terms used in this chapter:

(a) “Covered establishment” means any industrial or commercial facility or part thereof that employs, or has employed within the preceding 12 months, 75 or more persons.

(b) “Employer” means any person, as defined by Section 18, who directly or indirectly owns and operates a covered establishment. A parent corporation is an employer as to any covered establishment
 directly owned and operated by its corporate subsidiary.

(c) “Layoff” means a separation from a position for lack of funds or lack of work.

(d) “Mass layoff” means a layoff during any 30-day period of 50 or more employees at a covered establishment.

(e) “Relocation” means the removal of all or substantially all of the industrial or commercial operations in a covered establishment to a different location 100 miles or more away.

(f) “Termination” means the cessation or substantial cessation of industrial or commercial operations in a covered establishment.

(g) (1) This chapter does not apply where the closing or layoff is the result of the completion of a particular
 project or undertaking of an employer subject to Wage Order 11, regulating the Broadcasting Industry, Wage Order 12, regulating the Motion Picture Industry, or Wage Order 16, regulating Certain On-Site Occupations in the Construction, Drilling, Logging and Mining Industries, of the Industrial Welfare Commission, and the employees were hired with the understanding that their employment was limited to the duration of that project or undertaking.

(2) This chapter does not apply to employees who are employed in seasonal employment where the employees were hired with the understanding that their employment was seasonal and temporary.

(h) “Employee” means a person employed by an employer for at least 6 months of the 12 months preceding the date on which notice is required.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1400 by Stats. 2022, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (AB 1601)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1401.

(a) An employer may not order a mass layoff, relocation, or termination at a covered establishment unless, 60 days before the order takes effect, the employer gives written notice of the order to the following:

(1) The employees of the covered establishment affected by the order.

(2) The Employment Development Department, the local workforce development board, and the chief elected official of each city and county government within which the
 termination, relocation, or mass layoff occurs.

(b) An employer required to give notice of any mass layoff, relocation, or termination under this chapter shall include in its notice the elements required by the federal Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2101 et seq.).

(c) An employer required to give notice of any mass layoff, relocation, or termination under this chapter shall include in the notice whether the employer plans to coordinate services, such as a rapid response orientation, through the local workforce development board, the employer plans to coordinate services through a different entity, or the employer does not plan to coordinate services with any entity.

(1) Regardless of whether the employer chooses to coordinate services with the local workforce development board or another entity, the employer shall include in the notice a functioning email and telephone number of the board and the following description of the rapid response activities offered by the local workforce development board in accordance with Chapter 32 (commencing with Section 3102) of Title 29 of the United States Code:

“Local Workforce Development Boards and their partners help laid off workers find new jobs. Visit an America’s Job Center of California location near you. You can get help with your resume, practice interviewing, search for jobs, and more. You can also learn about training programs to help start a new career.”

(2) If the employer chooses to coordinate services with the local workforce development board or another entity, the employer shall arrange services within 30 days from the date of the notice.

(d) An employer required to give notice of any mass layoff, relocation, or termination under this chapter shall include in the
 notice a description of the statewide food assistance program known as CalFresh (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), the CalFresh benefits helpline, and a link to the CalFresh internet website.

(e) An employer required to give notice of any mass layoff, relocation, or termination under this chapter shall include in the notice a functioning email and telephone number of the employer for contact.

(f) Notwithstanding the requirements of subdivision (a), an employer is not required to provide notice if a mass layoff, relocation, or termination is necessitated by a physical calamity or act of war.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 229, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1402.

(a) An employer who fails to give notice as required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1401 before ordering a mass layoff, relocation, or termination is liable to each employee entitled to notice who lost his or her employment for:

(1) Back pay at the average regular rate of compensation received by the employee during the last three years of his or her employment, or the employee’s final rate of compensation, whichever is higher.

(2) The value of the cost of any benefits to which the employee would have been entitled had his or her employment not been lost, including the cost of any medical expenses incurred by the employee that would have been covered under an employee benefit plan.

(b) Liability under this section is calculated for the period of the employer’s violation, up to a maximum of 60 days, or one-half the number of days that the employee was employed by the employer, whichever period is smaller.

(c) The amount of an employer’s liability under subdivision (a) is reduced by the following:

(1) Any wages, except vacation moneys accrued prior to the period of the employer’s violation, paid by the employer to the employee during the period of the employer’s violation.

(2) Any voluntary and unconditional payments made by the employer to the employee that were not required to satisfy any legal obligation.

(3) Any payments by the employer to a third party or trustee, such as premiums for health benefits or payments to a defined contribution pension plan, on behalf of and attributable to the employee for the period of the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1402.5.

(a) An employer is not required to comply with the notice requirement contained in subdivision (a) of Section 1401 if the department determines that all of the following conditions exist:

(1) As of the time that notice would have been required, the employer was actively seeking capital or business.

(2) The capital or business sought, if obtained, would have enabled the employer to avoid or postpone the relocation or
 termination.

(3) The employer reasonably and in good faith believed that giving the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 1401 would have precluded the employer from obtaining the needed capital or business.

(b) The department may not determine that the employer was actively seeking capital or business under subdivision (a) unless the employer provides the department with both of the following:

(1) A written record consisting of all documents relevant to the determination of whether the employer was actively seeking capital or business, as specified by the department.

(2) An affidavit verifying the contents of the documents contained in the record.

(c) The affidavit provided to the
 department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall contain a declaration signed under penalty of perjury stating that the affidavit and the contents of the documents contained in the record submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) are true and correct.

(d) This section does not apply to notice of a mass layoff as defined by subdivision (d) of Section 1400.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1403.

An employer who fails to give notice as required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1401 is subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each day of the employer’s violation. The employer is not subject to a civil penalty under this section, however, if the employer pays to all applicable employees the amounts for which the employer is liable under Section 1402 within three weeks from the date the employer orders the mass layoff, relocation, or termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1404.

A person, including a local government or an employee representative, seeking to establish liability against an employer may bring a civil action on behalf of the person, other persons similarly situated, or both, in any court of competent jurisdiction. The court may award reasonable attorney’s fees as part of costs to any plaintiff who prevails in a civil action brought under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1405.

If the court determines that an employer conducted a reasonable investigation in good faith, and had reasonable grounds to believe that its conduct was not a violation of this chapter, the court may reduce the amount of any penalty imposed against the employer under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1406.

(a) In any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the Labor Commissioner has, in addition to all other powers granted by law, the authority to examine the books and records of an employer.

(b) The Labor Commissioner may enforce the notice requirements in Section 1401 and subdivision (a) of Section 1410, including investigating an alleged violation and ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate the violation pending the completion of a full investigation or hearing, through the procedures set forth in Section 98.3 or
 1197.1, including by issuance of a citation against an employer who violates this chapter. If a citation is issued, the procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations and civil penalties issued by the commissioner shall be the same as those set forth in Section 1197.1, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 752, Sec. 3.   (AB 1601)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1407.

(a) Payments to a person under subdivision (a) of Section 1402 by an employer who has failed to provide the advance notice of facility closure required by this chapter or the federal Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2101 et seq.) may not be construed as wages or compensation for personal services under Article 2 (commencing with Section 926) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(b) Benefits payable under Chapter 5
 (commencing with Section 1251) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may not be denied or reduced because of the receipt of payments related to an employer’s violation of this chapter or the federal Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2101 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1408.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Relocation of Call Centers [1409. - 1413.]

1409.

(a) This article shall apply to an employer’s relocation of a call center, as defined in this article.

(b) The definitions set forth in this subdivision shall apply to the construction and meaning of terms used in this article. The definitions set forth in Section 1400.5 also apply to this article, except for the definition of “relocation” contained in subdivision (e) of Section 1400.5.

(1) “Call center” means a facility or other operation where employees, as their primary function, receive telephone calls or other electronic communication for the purpose of providing customer service or other related functions.

(2) “Call center employer” means an employer of a covered establishment, as those terms are defined in Section 1400.5, who operates a call center.

(3) “Relocation of a call center” includes when the employer intends to move its call center, or one or more facilities or operating units within a call center comprising at least 30 percent of the call center’s or operating unit’s total volume when measured against the average call volume for the previous 12 months, or substantially similar operations to a foreign country.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   (AB 1601)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1410.

(a) A call center employer shall not order a relocation of its call center, or one or more of its facilities or operating units within a call center, unless notice of the relocation is provided in accordance with Section 1401. If a call center employer is required to provide notice under subdivision (a) of Section 1401 and this section, the call center employer may provide a single notice. However, a notice of the relocation of a call center shall include “This notice is for the relocation of a call center” at the top of the notice.

(b) The Employment Development Department shall compile and publish semiannually, on its internet website, a list of call center employers operating a call center that provided notice pursuant to subdivision (a). This list shall include
 elements required by the federal Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2101 et seq.).

(c) The Employment Development Department and local workforce development boards shall provide workforce services to call center employers and their call center employees who are laid off as a result of the relocation of a call center, as defined in Section 1409.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 136.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1410.5.

(a) A violation of subdivision (a) of Section 1410 shall be enforced through the provisions and remedies contained in Article 1 (commencing with Section 1400), including, but not limited to, Sections 1402, 1403, 1404, 1406, and 1407.

(b) A call center employer that is found liable for failing to provide the notice required under this article shall not also be liable for violations for failing to provide notice under Section 1401 under the same facts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   (AB 1601)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1411.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), and notwithstanding any other law, a call center employer that appears on the list described in subdivision (b) of Section 1410, or who should have appeared on the list but did not provide notice as specified, shall be ineligible to be awarded or have renewed any direct or indirect state grants or state-guaranteed loans to that call center employer for five years after the date that the list is published, and that call center employer shall be ineligible to claim a tax credit for five taxable years beginning on and after the date that the list is published.

(b) The appropriate agency, after receiving a written request from a call center employer detailing the reasons for waiving the call center
 employer’s ineligibility under subdivision (a), and after consulting the list described in subdivision (b) of Section 1410, may waive the ineligibility provisions prescribed in subdivision (a) if the agency determines that the applicant call center employer demonstrates good cause to do so, which may include job loss or adverse impact on the state.

(c) As used in this section, “appropriate agency” means the agency that administers the relevant direct or indirect state grants, state-guaranteed loans, or tax credits referenced in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   (AB 1601)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1412.

This article shall not be construed to permit withholding or denial of payments, compensation, or benefits under any other state law, including state unemployment compensation, disability payments, or worker retraining or readjustment funds, to workers employed by call center employers that relocate to a foreign country.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   (AB 1601)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1413.

The Labor Commissioner and the Employment Development Department may adopt rules and regulations as necessary and proper to effectuate the purposes of this article, in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   (AB 1601)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.2. Property Service Workers Protection [1420. - 1434.]

1420.

For purposes of this part:

(a) “Commissioner” means the Labor Commissioner of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of the department. 

(b) (1) “Covered worker” means a janitor, including any individual predominantly working, whether as an employee, independent contractor, or franchisee, as a janitor, as that term is defined in the Service Contract Act Directory of Occupations maintained by the United States Department of Labor.

(2) “Covered worker” does not include any individual whose work duties are predominantly final cleanup of debris, grounds, and buildings near the completion of a construction, alteration, demolition,
 installation, or repair work project, including, but not limited to, street cleaners.

(c) “Current and valid registration” means an active registration pursuant to this part that is not expired or revoked.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Industrial Relations.

(e) “Director” means the Director of Industrial Relations.

(f) “Division” means the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement. 

(g) (1) “Employer” means any person or entity that employs at least one covered worker or otherwise engages by contract, subcontract, or franchise agreement for the provision of janitorial services by one or more covered workers. The term “employer” includes the term “covered
 successor employer,” but does not include an entity that is the recipient of the janitorial services.

(2) “Covered successor employer” means an employer who meets one or more of the following criteria:

(A) Uses substantially the same equipment, supervisors, and workforce to offer substantially the same services to substantially the same clients as a predecessor employer, unless the employer maintains the same workforce pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 1060) of Part 3. In addition, an employer who has operated with a current and valid registration for at least the preceding three years shall not be considered a covered successor employer for using substantially the same equipment, supervisors, and workforce to substantially the same clients, if all of the following apply:

(i) The individuals in the
 workforce were not referred or supplied for employment by the predecessor employer to the successor employer.

(ii) The successor employer has not had any interest in, or connection with, the operation, ownership, management, or control of the business of the predecessor employer within the preceding three years.

(B) Shares in the ownership, management, control of the workforce, or interrelations of business operations with the predecessor employer.

(C) Is an immediate family member of any owner, partner, officer, licensee, or director of the predecessor employer or of any person who had a financial interest in the predecessor employer. “Immediate family member” means a spouse, parent, sibling, son, daughter, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, grandparent, grandson, granddaughter, mother-in-law, father-in-law,
 brother-in-law, sister-in-law, or cousin.

(h) “Production rates” means the average number of square feet the employee cleaned each hour during their shift, calculated by dividing the cleanable square footage of the property cleaned by the total hours worked to clean that square footage. 

(i) “Shift” means designated hours of work by an employee, with a designated beginning time and quitting time.

(j) “Square footage” means a unit of area equal to a square one foot long on each side. 

(k) “Supervisor” has the same meaning as in subdivision (t) of Section 12926 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1421.

Every employer shall keep accurate records for three years, showing all of the following:

(a) The names and addresses of all employees engaged in rendering actual services for any business of the employer.

(b) The hours worked daily by each employee, including the times the employee begins and ends each work period.

(c) The wage and wage rate paid each payroll period.

(d) The age of all minor employees.

(e) Any other conditions of employment.

(f) The names, addresses,
 periods of work, and compensation paid to all other covered workers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 24, Sec. 27.   (SB 83)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1422.

The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall enforce this part. The commissioner may adopt any regulations necessary to carry out this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 373, Sec. 1.   (AB 1978)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1423.

Effective July 1, 2018, every employer shall register with the commissioner annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 373, Sec. 1.   (AB 1978)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1424.

When a certificate of current and valid registration is originally issued or renewed under this part, the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall provide related and supplemental information to the registrant regarding business administration and applicable labor laws. As of July 1, 2018, employers covered by this part shall provide all covered workers a copy of the Civil Rights Department pamphlet CRD-185,
 entitled “Sexual Harassment,” until the sexual violence and harassment prevention training requirement is established pursuant to Section 1429.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 60.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1425.
